finished/orm.foma
source canonicalize.foma

def Alphabet [% |'|a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|q|r|s|t|u|w|x|y];

def Stem Alphabet+;
def Cons [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|q|r|s|t|w|x|y];
def Vow [a|e|i|o|u];

def Word Stem ["[V]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:["[PRS]" {+aa} { +jiraa}] | 
	 Stem ["[V]" "[PL]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:["[PRS]" {+aa} { +jiraa}]|
	 Stem ["[V]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{+dhee} | 
	 Stem ["[V]" "[PL]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{+nee} | 
	 ["[V]" "[FUT]"]:{ni+ } Stem ["[SG]" "[1]"]:{+dhaa} |
	 ["[V]" "[FUT]"]:{ni+ } Stem ["[PL]" "[1]"]:{+nnaa} |

	 Stem ["[V]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:["[PRS]" {+aa} { +jirtaa}] | 
	 Stem ["[V]" "[PL]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:["[PRS]" {+aa} { +jirtuu}] |
	 Stem ["[V]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{+ttee} | 
	 Stem ["[V]" "[PL]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{+ttanii} | 
	 ["[V]" "[FUT]"]:{ni+ } Stem ["[SG]" "[2]"]:{+ttaa} |
	 ["[V]" "[FUT]"]:{ni+ } Stem ["[PL]" "[2]"]:{+ttuu} |

	 Stem ["[V]" "[FEM]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:["[PRS]" {+aa} { +jirtii}] | 
	 Stem ["[V]" "[MASC]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:["[PRS]" {+aa} { +jiraa}] | 
	 Stem ["[V]" "[PL]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:["[PRS]" {+aa} { +jiranii}] |
	 Stem ["[V]" "[FEM]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{+ttee} | 
	 Stem ["[V]" "[MASC]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{+tee} | 
	 Stem ["[V]" "[PL]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{+tanii} | 
	 ["[V]" "[FUT]"]:{ni+ } Stem ["[FEM]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{+ttii} |
	 ["[V]" "[FUT]"]:{ni+ } Stem ["[MASC]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{+taa} |
	 ["[V]" "[FUT]"]:{ni+ } Stem ["[PL]" "[3]"]:{+tanii} |

	 Stem ["[V]" "[NFIN]"]:["[NFIN]" {+uu}] ;

def chStem  [{tol}|{nyaa}|{gaafa}|{yaada}|{hira}|{jiraa}|{bara}|{dubba}|{haxxifa}|{huba}|{fuumfa}|{darba}|{arga}|{hojje}] ;

def addCH1 "[PRS]" -> {ch} || chStem _ %+ ;
def addCH2 "[NFIN]" -> {ch} || chStem | {ba'a} | {dhaaba} _ %+ ;
def addCH addCH1 .o. addCH2;

#NFIN
def vowFinal  {+uu} -> 0 || Vow _ .#. ;
def NFin vowFinal;

#CLEANUP
def RemovePlus "+" -> 0;
def RemoveBrackets "[PRS]" | "[NFIN]" -> 0;
def RemoveUU {uu} -> 0 || Vow _ .#. ;

def Grammar Word ;

regex Canonicalize(Grammar .o. addCH .o. NFin .o. RemovePlus .o. RemoveBrackets .o. RemoveUU);

save stack orm.fomabin
#watt > orm.att
